src/twol-smn.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

Alphabet
 a á â ä b c d e f g h i j k l m n o õ p q
 r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å
 č đ ŋ ŧ š ž
 ¥:0 ! Vowel lengthening

! č đ ŋ š ŧ ž as in Northern Sámi

 A Á Â Å B C D E F G H I J K L M N O Õ P Q
 R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ä Ø Ö Å 
 Č Đ Ŋ Ŧ Š Ž 
 ':0 %-
 
! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

 É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ð testing without
 é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý þ ð 
 ß ª ß ç

 h2:h g2:g m2:m n2:n 
 b3:b d3:d g3:g m3:m h3:h 
 k2:k


      X2:0      X4:0 X5:0 X6:0 X7:0 X8:0 X9:0
 Q1:0 Q2:0 Q3:0 Q4:0 Q5:0 Q6:0 Q7:0 Q8:0 Q9:0 
 Y1:0 Y2:0 Y3:0 Y4:0 Y5:0 Y6:0 Y7:0 Y8:0 

 %^SHV:0 
 %^CPL:0 %^SCPL:0 
 %^SVL:0  %^WG1:0 %^VLOW:0 
%^ODDC:0
%^ODDSHV:0
%^ODDLV:0
%^XST:0 %^IA:0
%^ILL:0 

! Morpheme boundaries:
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
 %< ! Inflectional prefx
 %> ! Inflectional suffix
 #  ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 %^ ! (exceptional) soft hyphenation point

! End of alphabet definitions
;

Sets
 Vow = a á â ä e i o u y æ ø ö å
       é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý 
       A Á Â Ä E I O U Y Æ Ø Ö Å
       É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ú Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý 
       ¥ ;
 Cns = b c č d đ f g h j k l m n ŋ 
       p q r s š t ŧ v w x z ž
       B C č D Đ F G H J K L M N Ŋ
       P Q R S Š T Ŧ V W X Z Ž 
       ht g2 m2 n2 
       b3 d3 g3 m3 h3 
       k2 ;
! DelCns = g2 m2 n2 h2 ;
 WeG = %^WG1 X2 %^CPL ;
 StemCns = b b3 d d3 g g2 g3 h h2 h3 j l m m2 m3 n n2 ŋ r s ;
 Dummy = %^WG1 X2 %^SVL X4 %^VLOW %^CPL %^SCPL %^ODDC %^ODDLV %^ODDSHV 
         %^XST %^IA ;
 ODD = %^ODDC %^ODDLV %^ODDSHV ;


Rules



! Root vowel shortening

"Root Vowel Shortening in EAP"
Vx:0 <=> Vx _ Cns:* Vow X2:0 ;
       where Vx in ( a e o u ä ) ;
       
       
!€ šaaluX2%>ittáá
!€ ša0lu00ittáá

! Diphtong simplification
! -----------------------




! Stem vowel alternations
! -----------------------



"Adjust to á before Com Sg and Ill Pl"
 â:á <=> _ (Dummy:*) %>: %^IA: i [ n | d ] ;	
! No, we do the short one instead, as Matti Morottaja

"j after i-stem"
 i:j <=> i (Dummy:*) %>: (Dummy:*) _  ;	

! XXX not finished
"e stem to a"
 e:a <=> [a|e] Cns+: %>: _ ; 

! "Stem Vowel Change in Comitative"
!  Vx:Vy <=> _  %^SVL:0 ;
!        where Vx in ( â e )
!   	         Vy in ( á i )
! 	     matched ;
! mielgâ : mielg%^SVLáin
! alge : olgijn
! and the umlaut must be fixed as well...
	


! Cns stem alternations
! - - - - - - - - - -

"Long vowel shortening in Cns stems"
Vx:0 <=> Cns:* Vx _ Cns %^SHV:0 ;
     where Vx in (á i);


"Vowel lowering in Contracted Stems"
Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns+ Vow:* %^VLOW: ; 
      where Vx in (u a)
            Vy in (o á)
            matched ;






! Consonant gradation rules
! -------------------------


! Compensatory lengthening rule
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

"Compensatory lengthening"
¥:Vx <=> Vx _ Cns:* Vow:* (:StemCns) [ %^CPL: | %^SCPL: ] ;
	where Vx in ( a e i o u ) ;

! Deletion rules
! - - - - - - - -


"Gradation: Single Consonant"
 Cx:Cy <=> Vow (Vow:) _  Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
 	where Cx in ( p t h k c )
 		  Cy in ( v đ v h s )
 		  matched ;

"Gradation: Double Consonant" !káffe:káfes
  Cx:0 <=> Vow: Cy: _ Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
	where Cx in (p b d g m n ŋ d s z r š ž l v )
	      Cy in (p b d g m n ŋ d s z r š ž l v )
	      matched ;
! p t k š č c h đ, 
! Note: added : to Cy to allow for pp:v subrule below

"Gradation: pp:v"
  p:v <=> Vow: p: _ Vow ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;

"Gradation: xx:y 1"
 Cx:0 <=> Vow (Vow:) _ Cx:Cy Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
 	where Cx in ( t k č c )
 		  Cy in ( đ h j s )
 		  matched ;
! p in previous rule instead. We need both pp:p and pp:v.

"Gradation: xx:y 2"
 Cx:Cy <=> Vow (Vow:) Cx: _ Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
 	where Cx in ( t k č c )
 		  Cy in ( đ h j s )
 		  matched ;
 

"xkk:xk Gradation"
 k:0 <=> Vow: Cx _ k Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
	where Cx in ( ŋ r ) ;
	
"xtt:xt Gradation"
 t:0 <=> Vow: Cx _ t Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
	where Cx in ( i l n r ) ;
	
"xcc:xc Gradation"
 c:0 <=> Vow: Cx _ c Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
	where Cx in ( i l n r ) ;
	
"xpp:xp Gradation"
 p:0 <=> Vow: Cx _ p Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
	where Cx in ( l m r v ) ;
	
"xss:xs Gradation"
 s:0 <=> Vow: Cx _ s Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
	where Cx in ( l n r ) ;
	
"xčč:xč Gradation"
 č:0 <=> Vow: Cx _ č Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
	where Cx in ( l r ) ;
	
"xšš:xš Gradation"
 š:0 <=> Vow: Cx _ s Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;
	where Cx in ( l r ) ;
	
"nnj:nj Gradation"
 n:0 <=> Vow: n _ j Vow: ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) (Dummy:*) WeG: ;

	

	
! Change rules
! - - - - - - 


	
"h:v in Front of Voiceless Dentals"
 h:v <=> Vow:*  _ (s) [c|č|t] Vow: WeG: ;


"Consonant Lengthening"
 0:Cx <=> Vow _ Cx Vow: %^XST: ;
 	where Cx in ( t l s ) ;


! "i To j in High Vowel Suffixes"
!  i:j <=> %>: ( g u ) i _ [d|n] ;
 ! oohoid
 ! kuolijd

! "kk:h" ákku
! Cannot have kk as underlying form, because of kukká.



!Cx:Vx <=> Vx _ Cx Vow %^CPL: ;
!      where Cx in ( l p p )
!      	    Vx in ( u a ä )
!	    mixed ;


! konsonanten skal bli til nabovokalen.



!€ tullâ^CPL
!€ tuulâ0

! Hmm, do not like this rule, but the alternative is insertion, 
! also not good, or eventually a long baseform *tuullâ or *tuu7llâ, 
! where u7 is there just to be deleted unless in weak grade contexts.

!Idas regler för verb
!
!"Even syllabic verbs present sg, monophpt E I"
! Vx:Vy <=>  _ C+ (V) %>: %^1UML:0 ;
! 	where Vx in (i e u)
! 	      Vy in (æ a å)
! 	matched ;


! Odd-syllabic verb rules
! - - - - - - - - - - - - 

"t Shortening in Odd-Syllabic Verbs"
t:0 <=> t _ ODD:0 [#:0|%>: Cns] ;

!€ cie'lâtt#
!€ cie'lât0#

"V-Context Vowel Shortening in Odd-Syllabic Verbs"
Vx:0 <=> Vx _ %^ODDSHV:0 %>: Vow ;
     where Vx in (á a i e o);

"C-Context Vowel Shortening in Odd-Syllabic Verbs"
Vx:0 <=> Vx _ %^ODDLV:0 %>: [Cns|#:0] ;
     where Vx in (á a i e o);
